DI-73

DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATICTRANSMISSION (A750Ffor2UZ -FE)
DTC P0985/74 | Shift Solenoid ”E” Control Circuit Low
(Shift Solenoid Valve SR)
DTC P0986/74 | Shift Solenoid "E” Control Circuit High
(Shift Solenoid Valve SR)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

See page DI-49.

detection logic)

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

Engineand ECT ECU detects shortin solenoid valve SR cir-  Shortin shift solenoid valve SR circuit
P0985/74 cuit4times whensolenoid valve SRis operated (1 -tripdete¢- ¢ Shiftsolenoidvalve SR

tion logic) *EngineandECTECU

Engineand ECT ECU detects openin solenoid valve SR cir- ¢ Openinshiftsolenoid valve SR circuit
P0986/74 cuit4 times when solenoid valve SRis notoperated (1 ~trip « Shift solenoid valve SR

*EngineandECTECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

E1

Engine and ECT ECU
Electronically Controlled
Transmission Solenoid
7 15
SB G G V=
L) EB2 E8] SR
l SRl 7 {E82] =S
—

D12766

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)




DI-74

DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ-FE)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission

wire.
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.

CHECK:
Measure resistance between SR of transmission wire connec-

tor and body ground.

OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)

NG> Go to step 3.

nector.

2 [ Measure resistance between terminal SR and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU con-
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PREPARATION:
(@ Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SR and E1 of Engine
and ECT ECU connector.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN-38).

(See page IN-38).

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ-FE)

3 Check shift solenoid valve SR.
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PREPARATION:
(@) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
() Remove the shift solenoid valve SR.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
minal and the battery negative lead to the solenoid body
ground.
OK:
Solenoid sounds operation noise.

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve SR
(See page AT-8).

Repair or replace the transmission wire

(See page AT-6).
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